Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-5139
Investment trusts and investment companies.

(1) An insurer may invest in shares of a fund registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, as a diversified open-end investment company and in shares, interests, or participation certificates in any management type of investment trust, corporate or otherwise, subject to the following restrictions:

(a) The investment restrictions and policies relating to the investment of the assets of the trust and its activities shall be limited to the same kinds, classes, and investment grades as those authorized for investment under the Insurers Investment Act; and

(b) The assets of such investment trust shall not be less than twenty million dollars at the date of purchase.

An insurer's investments authorized under this subsection shall not exceed ten percent of its admitted assets.

(2) An insurer may invest in the shares of a fund registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, as a diversified open-end investment company when the investment restrictions and policies relating to the investment of the assets of the fund and its activities are limited solely to (a) obligations, (b) commitments to purchase obligations, or (c) assignments of interest in obligations issued or guaranteed by the United States or its agencies or instrumentalities. An insurer's investments authorized under this subsection shall not exceed twenty-five percent of its admitted assets.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 39;

Laws 2022, LB863, § 31.